Tennessee, session 114, HB1758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-2108, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting instead the following:
(a)
(1) The local board of education shall require each school bus driver to:
(A) Annually submit to a physical and mental examination; or
(B) Annually verify that the school bus driver possesses a valid
certificate issued by a medical examiner certified by the Federal Motor
Carrier Safety Administration within the United States department of
transportation who is listed on the National Registry of Certified Medical
Examiners signifying that the school bus driver is medically qualified to
operate a commercial motor vehicle pursuant to 49 C.F.R. Part 391.
(2)
(A) The local board shall require the results of a physical and
mental examination of a school bus driver conducted for purposes of
subdivision (a)(1)(A) be made on forms prescribed by the local board.
(B) The local board may rely upon records maintained by the
department of safety to confirm a school bus driver's compliance with the
requirements in subdivision (a)(1)(B).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1758
010855
- 1 -